Colorado, session 2026A, SB059.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 2-2-328 as
follows:
2-2-328. Members of the general assembly prohibited from
holding multiple elected offices.
(1) COMMENCING WITH THE FIRST REGULAR SESSION OF THE
SEVENTY-SIXTH GENERAL ASSEMBLY, AND DURING EACH REGULAR SESSION
THEREAFTER, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, A
MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL NOT HOLD ANY OTHER ELECTED
OFFICE WHILE SERVING AS A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY. THIS
SECTION APPLIES TO A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY UPON TAKING
THE OATH OF OFFICE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AS REQUIRED BY SECTION
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

2 (2) OF ARTICLE V OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(2) THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION DO NOT
APPLY IF:
(a) THE MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY HOLDS A SPECIAL
DISTRICT ELECTED OFFICE;
(b) THE MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY HAS LESS THAN ONE
YEAR REMAINING IN THEIR TERM IN ANOTHER ELECTED OFFICE AT THE TIME
THE MEMBER TAKES THE OATH OF OFFICE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AS
REQUIRED BY SECTION 2 (2) OF ARTICLE V OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION;
(c) THE MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY HAS LESS THAN ONE
YEAR REMAINING IN THEIR TERM IN THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AT THE TIME
THE MEMBER TAKES THE OATH OF OFFICE OF ANOTHER ELECTED OFFICE; OR
(d) THE MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IS A SENATOR WHO IS
IN THE MIDDLE OF THEIR TERM AT THE BEGINNING OF THE FIRST REGULAR
SESSION OF THE SEVENTY-SIXTH GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-059

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-059